Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2289.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 107.1. Health Care Sharing Ministries.--A health care sharing ministry, and the operation thereof, shall not be considered an insurance company, health maintenance organization or health benefit plan of any type in this Commonwealth subject to the laws or regulations of this Commonwealth respecting insurance companies, health maintenance organizations or health 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 benefit plans of any type and shall not be subject to the jurisdiction of the Insurance Commissioner. The operation of a health care sharing ministry shall not constitute the transaction of insurance business and shall not be considered an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the conduct of trade or commerce prohibited by the laws of this Commonwealth. As used in this section, the term "health care sharing ministry" means a faith-based nonprofit organization:(1) Whose members share a common set of similar and sincerely held ethical or religious beliefs.(2) That shares medical expenses in accordance with a common set of ethical or religious beliefs and allows members to retain membership even after developing a medical condition.(3) That establishes amounts that any member may contribute voluntarily for distribution by the organization to or for the direct benefit of other members, with no assumption of risk or promise to pay among the members or by the organization.(4) That facilitates, coordinates and administers the sharing of medical expenses among members using funds voluntarily and willingly contributed by members according to criteria established by the organization.(5) That makes a monthly statement available to all members that lists the total amount of qualified medical expense needs submitted for sharing, as well as the amount actually paid towards member medical expenses.(6) That provides for an annual audit by an independent certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and makes the annual audit available to the public upon request.(7) That includes on or with all membership applications, 20260HB2289PN2998 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 member terms and conditions and sharing guidelines published or distributed by the organization a written disclaimer that reads, in substance:NOTICE. A Health Care Sharing Ministry (HCSM) is not an insurance company, financial assistance through its programs is not insurance, and this document is not an insurance policy or contract. Contributions for sharing are voluntary and neither the organization nor any member can be compelled by law to contribute toward your medical bills. Whether or not you receive sharing assistance, or this organization continues to operate, you are always personally responsible for the payment of your own medical bills. This organization and sharing program are not regulated by the Pennsylvania Department of Insurance. You should review all sharing guidelines carefully to understand any limitations that may affect your personal medical and financial needs.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2289PN2998 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617